Tennessee, session 114, SB0997.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 6-51-104(a)(2), is amended by
deleting subdivision (B) and substituting:
(B)
(i) Two thirds (2/3) of the property owners within the territory proposed for
annexation consent in writing;
(ii) The total area of the property owned by the owners consenting to
annexation under subdivision (a)(2)(B)(i) is more than one-half (1/2) of the
territory proposed for annexation; and
(iii) The proposed annexation consists of nine (9) or fewer parcels.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0997
002539
- 1 -